Colorado, session 2026A, HB1407.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-226.5, add (6.5)
as follows:
24-75-226.5. ARPA refinance state money cash fund - creation
- reduction in general fund appropriations - legislative intent -
definitions - repeal.
(6.5) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
FROM THE REFINANCE DISCRETIONARY ACCOUNT TO THE GENERAL FUND
TWENTY-SEVEN MILLION NINE HUNDRED FIVE THOUSAND THREE HUNDRED
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

EIGHTY-FOUR DOLLARS.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-227, amend
(3.8) as follows:
24-75-227. Revenue loss restoration cash fund - creation -
allowable uses - definitions - repeal.
(3.8) (a) On June 30, 2025, the state treasurer shall transfer from the
fund to the general fund twelve million four hundred sixty-one thousand
four hundred ninety-four dollars and ten cents of money that did not
originate from the money the state received from the coronavirus state fiscal
recovery fund.
(b) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND FOUR MILLION EIGHTY-FIVE
THOUSAND TWO HUNDRED FORTY-SIX DOLLARS AND FORTY-NINE CENTS OF
MONEY THAT DID NOT ORIGINATE FROM THE MONEY THE STATE RECEIVED
FROM THE CORONAVIRUS STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-228, add (5.3)
as follows:
24-75-228. Economic recovery and relief cash fund - creation -
allowable uses - interim task force - report - legislative declaration -
definitions - repeal.
(5.3) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND ONE MILLION NINE HUNDRED
SEVENTY-FOUR THOUSAND SEVEN HUNDRED TWO DOLLARS AND TWENTY
CENTS OF MONEY THAT DID NOT ORIGINATE FROM THE MONEY THE STATE
RECEIVED FROM THE CORONAVIRUS STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-230, amend
(4.8); and add (4.5) and (4.9) as follows:
24-75-230. Behavioral and mental health cash fund - creation -
allowable uses - task force - definitions - repeal.
(4.5) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1407

FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND ONE MILLION FIVE THOUSAND EIGHT
HUNDRED FIFTY DOLLARS AND TWENTY-FOUR CENTS OF MONEY THAT DID
NOT ORIGINATE FROM THE MONEY THE STATE RECEIVED FROM THE
CORONAVIRUS STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND.
(4.8) Pursuant to section 24-75-226.5 (6), On December 31, 2026,
the state treasurer shall transfer any unexpended and unencumbered money
in the fund that originates from the ARPA refinance state money cash fund
to the ARPA refinance state money cash fund; EXCEPT THAT,
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 24-75-226.5 (6), THE STATE TREASURER SHALL
NOT TRANSFER UNSPENT MONEY APPROPRIATED FROM THE FUND TO THE
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES FOR CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION RELATED TO
THE CONSTRUCTION OF A NEURO-PSYCH FACILITY AT THE COLORADO
MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE AT FORT LOGAN.
(4.9) ON JUNE 30, 2027, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
THE UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE FUND THAT DID NOT
ORIGINATE FROM THE MONEY THE STATE RECEIVED FROM THE CORONAVIRUS
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-219, add (7)(l)
as follows:
24-75-219. Transfers - transportation - capital construction -
definitions.
(7) In addition to any other transfers required by this section:
(l) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER FROM
THE STATE HIGHWAY FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND SEVEN HUNDRED FIFTY
THOUSAND ONE HUNDRED NINETY DOLLARS AND SIX CENTS OF MONEY THAT
DID NOT ORIGINATE FROM THE MONEY THE STATE RECEIVED FROM THE
FEDERAL CORONAVIRUS STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND.
SECTION 6. Appropriation to the department of human
services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2022. In Session Laws of
Colorado 2022, amend section 10 of chapter 185, (HB22-1283), as
amended by section 63 of chapter 429, (HB24-1466), as follows:
Section 10. Capital construction appropriation. For the 2022-23
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1407

state fiscal year, $35,000,000 is appropriated to the department of human
services. This appropriation is from the behavioral and mental health cash
fund created in section 24-75-230 (2)(a), C.R.S. Of this amount,
$30,236,662 originates from the general fund and $4,763,338 is of money
the state received from the federal coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund. To
implement this act, the department may use this appropriation for capital
construction related to the construction of a neuro-psych facility at the
Colorado mental health institute at Fort Logan. Any money appropriated in
this section not expended prior to July 1, 2023, THAT IS OF MONEY THE
STATE RECEIVED FROM THE FEDERAL CORONAVIRUS STATE FISCAL
RECOVERY FUND is further appropriated to the administration from July 1,
2023, through December 31, 2026, for the same purpose. ANY MONEY
APPROPRIATED IN THIS SECTION NOT EXPENDED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2023, THAT
DID NOT ORIGINATE FROM THE MONEY THE STATE RECEIVED FROM THE
CORONAVIRUS STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND IS FURTHER APPROPRIATED TO
THE ADMINISTRATION FROM JULY 1, 2023, THROUGH JUNE 30, 2027, FOR THE
SAME PURPOSE. Money that originated from the federal coronavirus state
fiscal recovery fund shall be obligated and expended in accordance with
section 24-75-226, C.R.S.
SECTION 7. Appropriation to the department of health care
policy and financing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2022. In
Session Laws of Colorado 2022, section 6 of chapter 180, (HB 22-1302),
amend (2), as amended by section 20 of chapter 474, Session Laws of
Colorado 2023 (SB 23-214), and as further amended by section 77 of
chapter 429, Session Laws of Colorado 2024 (HB 24-1466), as follows:
Section 6. Appropriation. (2) For the 2022-23 state fiscal year,
$3,000,000 $2,200,000 is appropriated to the department of health care
policy and financing for use by the executive director's office, general
administration. This appropriation is from the behavioral and mental health
cash fund created in section 24-75-230 (2)(a), C.R.S. Of this amount,
$1,245,147 is of money the state received from the federal coronavirus state
fiscal recovery fund and $1,754,853 $954,853 originates from the general
fund. To implement this act, the division may use this appropriation for the
universal contract for behavioral health services. Any money appropriated
in this section that is not expended prior to December 30, 2024, is further
appropriated to the department for use prior to December 31, 2026, for the
same purpose. Money that originated from the federal coronavirus state
fiscal recovery fund shall be obligated and expended in accordance with
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1407

section 24-75-226, C.R.S.
SECTION 8. Appropriation to the department of early
childhood for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2022. In Session Laws of
Colorado 2022, section 8 of chapter 345, (SB 22-213), amend (1)
introductory portion, (1)(a), (1)(c), (1)(d), and (1)(e), as (1) introductory
portion is amended by section 71 of chapter 429, Session Laws of Colorado
2024 (HB 24-1466) as follows:
Section 8. Appropriation. (1) For the 2022-23 state fiscal year,
$49,500,000 $47,883,011 is appropriated to the department of early
childhood. This appropriation is from the economic recovery and relief cash
fund created in section 24-75-228 (2)(a), C.R.S., and is based on an
assumption that the department will require an additional 9.6 FTE. Of this
amount, $15,464,449 is of money the state received from the federal
coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund and $34,035,551 $32,418,562
originates from the general fund. To implement this act, the department may
use this appropriation for:
(a) $16,000,000 $14,656,182 for use by the early learning access and
quality division for the emerging and expanding child care grant program,
which amount is based on an assumption that the division will require an
additional 3.5 FTE;
(c) $15,000,000 $14,737,721 for use by the early learning access and
quality division for the early care and education recruitment and retention
grant and scholarship program, which amount is based on an assumption
that the division will require an additional 2.5 FTE;
(d) $7,500,000 $7,492,769 for use by the early learning access and
quality division for the family, friend, and neighbor training and support
program, which amount is based on an assumption that the division will
require an additional 2.8 FTE; and
(e) $1,000,000 $996,339 for use by the community and family
support division for the home visiting grant program, which amount is
based on an assumption that the division will require an additional 0.3 FTE.
SECTION 9. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1407

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1407